Massachusetts, session 194th, H1429.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
separate fund to be known as the Faculty Restoration and Equity Fund, hereinafter referred to as
the fund. The fund shall provide resources to institutions of public higher education in the
commonwealth to: (1) ensure that no less than 75 percent of undergraduate courses are taught by
full time faculty and (2) ensure adequate support staff at each institutional by requiring that that
no less than 75 percent of support and professional staff in each institutional department are full
time employees; and (3) ensure that part-time and other non-tenure track faculty receive fully
comparable pay, including per course pay parity, and benefits to full-time tenure and tenure-track
faculty according to the provisions of section 2 of this act. The department of higher education
shall determine funding allocation, with priority given to institutions with the highest utilization
of part-time and non-tenure track faculty.
of 4

Section 2. Section 3(2)(d) of Chapter 32, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
For purposes of this section and notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or any
other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any faculty who teach the
equivalent of at least two three credit courses per semester or four three- or more- credit courses
per calendar year at one or more state higher education institution, including a division of
continuing education, regardless of funding source, including but not limited to subsidiary
account CC, shall be considered an employee eligible for membership in the state employees
retirement system and shall earn creditable service for such time.
Section 3. Section 4(2)(b) of Chapter 32, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended by inserting the following in line 476 after the word “membership” the following; -
provided, that in the case of any faculty employed at one or more state higher education
institution, the board shall credit as at least one-half year of service, actual service teaching the
equivalent of at least four three- credit courses per calendar year;
Section 4. Section 4(2)(c) of Chapter 32, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended by adding the following paragraph: -
For faculty employed at one or more state higher education institution, the board, in
accordance with the provisions of this section, shall allow credit for any previous period of
service equivalent to teaching at least four three- credit courses per calendar year at one or more
state higher education institution, including a division of continuing education, regardless of
funding source, including but not limited to subsidiary account CC.
of 4

Section 5. Section 1 of Chapter 32, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is amended
by inserting in line 457 after the word “fund.” the following sentence: -
In the case of part-time faculty employed at one or more state higher education
institution, the full salary and wages received for teaching credit courses at one or more state
higher education institution, including a division of continuing education, regardless of funding
source, including but not limited to subsidiary account CC, shall be regarded as regular
compensation and shall be included in the salary on which deductions are to be paid to the
annuity savings fund.
Section 6. Section 2 (e) of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 114 by inserting after the word “hours” the following:
- or faculty who teach the equivalent of at least two three or more- credit courses per semester or
four three or more- credit courses per calendar year at one of more state higher education
institutions, including a division of continuing education, regardless of funding source, including
but not limited to subsidiary account CC, and regardless of the term of employment;
Section 7. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, the state employees
retirement system shall contribute an amount equal to not less than 7.5 percent of each
employee's regular compensation to all part-time or non-tenure track faculty member employed
at a public institution of higher education who are enrolled in the Commonwealth s SMART
Plan, as permitted by the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990.
Section 8. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, all part-time and
adjunct faculty shall, subject to collective bargaining with the exclusive representatives of the
full-time and part-time faculty at the public institution of higher education, receive pay that is
of 4

equal, on a pro rata basis, with that of full-time, non-tenure track faculty of comparable
qualifications doing comparable work.
Section 9. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, each public institution
of higher education shall establish a process under which part-time and other non-tenure track
faculty, after successful completion of a probationary period, receive timely notice and priority
consideration, consistent with other institutional and state policies, for part-time and non-tenure
track teaching assignments. The provisions of this section are subject to collective bargaining
between the public institutions of higher education and the exclusive representatives of part-time
and non-tenure track faculty
Section 10. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, each public institution
of higher education shall create a process for ensuring that qualified non-tenure track faculty
members receive full and fair consideration in attaining a tenure-track position when one
becomes available, consistent with department needs, institutional and state affirmative action,
and other personnel policies. This process shall ensure that non-tenure track faculty: (1)
accumulate seniority; (2) are notified of job openings prior to the job being posted outside of the
institution; and (3) are interviewed during the search and screen process. The provisions of this
section are subject to collective bargaining between the public institution of higher education and
the exclusive representatives of part time and non-tenure track faculty.
Section 11. Nothing in this act shall be construed to either limit or reduce salaries,
benefits or hiring rights in existence at any public institution of higher education at the time this
legislation passes into law.
of 4